Maryland, session 2026, HB1541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study Extreme Risk Protective Orders.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(3) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee;
(4) the President of the Maryland Chiefs of Police Association, or the
President’s designee;
(5) the President of the Maryland Sheriffs’ Association, or the President’s
designee; and
(6) one representative, appointed by the Governor, of an organization
specializing in providing mental health services in the State.
(c) The Secretary of Health shall be the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Department of Health shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1541*

HOUSE BILL 1541
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) study the use of extreme risk protective orders in the State; and
(2) develop policy recommendations for improving the use of extreme risk
protective orders in the State.
(g) On or before May 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.